Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.080

Directors—Election and appointment.

(1) Associations shall be managed by a board of not less than three directors (which may be referred to as "trustees"). The directors shall be elected by the members of the association at such time, in such manner, and for such term of office as the bylaws may prescribe, and shall hold office during the term for which they were elected and until their successors are elected and qualified.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 23.86.087, any vacancy occurring in the board of directors, and any directorship to be filled by reason of an increase in the number of directors, may be filled by the board of directors unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws provide that a vacancy or directorship so created shall be filled in some other manner. A director elected or appointed to fill a vacancy shall be elected or appointed for the unexpired term of the predecessor in office.

[ 2003 c 252 s 1; 1989 c 307 s 10; 1913 c 19 s 5; RRS s 3908. Formerly RCW 23.56.080.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.